Hawaii statutes.
§577-14 Children born to parents not
married to each other; support. Except as otherwise provided by law,
children whose parents have not been legally married, in contemplation of
chapter 572, shall be designated as children whose parents have not been married
to each other at the time of the children's birth, provided that any person,
who in writing duly acknowledged before an officer authorized to take
acknowledgments declares himself to be the father of those children, shall be
compellable to provide those children with necessary maintenance and support
and to pay the expenses of the mother's pregnancy and confinement. The mothers
in all cases shall be compellable to maintain and support them during their
minority. [CC 1859, §1289; RL 1925, §3042; RL 1935, §4528; RL 1945, §12279; am
L 1953, c 103, §1; RL 1955, §330-12; HRS §577-14; am L 1976, c 200, pt of §1;
am L 1997, c 52, §7; am L 1998, c 11, §31]

Cross References

Descent of property to child born to parents not married to
each other, see §532-6.

From persons born to parents not married to each other, see
§532-7.

Inheritance by children, see §§560:2-114 and 580-25.

Case Notes

Illegitimate child does not inherit from grandfather. 20 H.
722.

Mother of illegitimate child entitled to custody as against
stranger to whom child surrendered or given, but not adopted. 27 H. 158.

Oral statement to person that he may have custody and adopt
may be revoked any time before adoption. 31 H. 328.

Parent-child relationship, evidence of; presumption. 48 H.
193, 397 P.2d 552.

Cited: 16 H. 502, 505.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next